dictionaries/sk_SK-ascii.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1103 N 1
SFX 1103 e ych .
SFX 1104 N 1
SFX 1104 e ymi .
SFX 1105 N 1
SFX 1105 er rermi .
SFX 1106 N 1
SFX 1106 a oma .
SFX 1107 N 1
SFX 1107 a omi .
SFX 1108 N 1
SFX 1108 0 ja .
SFX 1109 N 1
SFX 1109 cia iec .
SFX 1110 N 1
SFX 1110 ia ami .
SFX 1111 N 1
SFX 1111 ere ier .
SFX 1112 N 1
SFX 1112 r om .
SFX 1113 N 1
SFX 1113 lo el .
SFX 1114 N 1
SFX 1114 st dem .
SFX 1115 N 1
SFX 1115 st des .
SFX 1116 N 1
SFX 1116 st de .
SFX 1117 N 1
SFX 1117 st deme .
SFX 1118 N 1
SFX 1118 st dete .
SFX 1119 N 1
SFX 1119 st du .
SFX 1120 N 1
SFX 1120 st di .
SFX 1121 N 1
SFX 1121 st dime .
SFX 1122 N 1
SFX 1122 st dite .
SFX 1123 N 1
SFX 1123 st duc .
SFX 1124 N 1
SFX 1124 jst siel .
SFX 1125 N 1
SFX 1125 jst sla .
SFX 1126 N 1
SFX 1126 jst slo .
SFX 1127 N 1
SFX 1127 jst sli .
SFX 1128 N 1
SFX 1128 in nami .
SFX 1129 N 1
SFX 1129 ba ob .
SFX 1130 Y 1
SFX 1130 y ejsich .
PFX 1130 Y 1
PFX 1130 0 najd .
SFX 1131 N 1
SFX 1131 edo ied .
SFX 1132 N 1
SFX 1132 erto iert .
SFX 1133 N 1
SFX 1133 iaze azi .
SFX 1134 N 1
SFX 1134 by ieb .
SFX 1135 N 1
SFX 1135 lum iel .
SFX 1136 N 1
SFX 1136 os se .
SFX 1137 N 1
SFX 1137 os si .
SFX 1138 N 1
SFX 1138 os sou .
SFX 1139 N 1
SFX 1139 os siam .
SFX 1140 N 1
SFX 1140 os siach .
SFX 1141 N 1
SFX 1141 os sami .
SFX 1142 N 1
SFX 1142 x gu .
SFX 1143 N 1
SFX 1143 x gom .
SFX 1144 N 1
SFX 1144 x gy .
SFX 1145 N 1
SFX 1145 x gov .
SFX 1146 N 1
SFX 1146 x goch .
SFX 1147 N 1
SFX 1147 x gami .
SFX 1148 N 1
SFX 1148 la b .
SFX 1149 N 1
SFX 1149 ga b .
SFX 1150 N 1
SFX 1150 ik ka .
SFX 1151 N 1
SFX 1151 ik ku .
SFX 1152 N 1
SFX 1152 ik kom .
SFX 1153 N 1
SFX 1153 ik ky .
SFX 1154 N 1
SFX 1154 ik kov .
SFX 1155 N 1
SFX 1155 ik koch .
SFX 1156 N 1
SFX 1156 ik kami .
SFX 1157 N 1
SFX 1157 o ah .
SFX 1158 N 1
SFX 1158 eba ieb .
SFX 1159 N 1
SFX 1159 na b .
SFX 1160 N 1
SFX 1160 er ry .
SFX 1161 N 1
SFX 1161 asa ias .
SFX 1162 Y 1
SFX 1162 o 0 .
PFX 1162 Y 1
PFX 1162 g gi .
SFX 1163 N 1
SFX 1163 on i .
SFX 1164 N 1
SFX 1164 on anmi .
SFX 1165 N 1
SFX 1165 ter etra .
SFX 1166 N 1
SFX 1166 0 s .
SFX 1167 N 1
SFX 1167 ra ar .
SFX 1168 N 1
SFX 1168 en ie .
SFX 1169 N 1
SFX 1169 en ych .
SFX 1170 N 1
SFX 1170 en ym .
SFX 1171 N 1
SFX 1171 en ymi .
SFX 1172 N 1
SFX 1172 en oho .
SFX 1173 N 1
SFX 1173 en omu .
SFX 1174 N 1
SFX 1174 en om .
SFX 1175 N 1
SFX 1175 en i .
SFX 1176 N 1
SFX 1176 o ie .
SFX 1177 N 1
SFX 1177 o ych .
SFX 1178 N 1
SFX 1178 o ym .
SFX 1179 N 1
SFX 1179 o ymi .
SFX 1180 N 1
SFX 1180 a ie .
SFX 1181 N 1
SFX 1181 lo iev .
SFX 1182 N 1
SFX 1182 oko sie .
SFX 1183 Y 1
SFX 1183 oko sie .
PFX 1183 Y 1
PFX 1183 0 naj .
SFX 1184 N 1
SFX 1184 oky si .
SFX 1185 N 1
SFX 1185 oky sieho .
SFX 1186 N 1
SFX 1186 oky siemu .
SFX 1187 N 1
SFX 1187 oky som .
SFX 1188 N 1
SFX 1188 oky sim .
SFX 1189 N 1
SFX 1189 oky sich .
SFX 1190 N 1
SFX 1190 oky simi .
SFX 1191 N 1
SFX 1191 oky sie .
SFX 1192 N 1
SFX 1192 oky sia .
SFX 1193 N 1
SFX 1193 oky sej .
SFX 1194 N 1
SFX 1194 oky siu .
SFX 1195 N 1
SFX 1195 oky sou .
SFX 1196 Y 1
SFX 1196 oky si .
PFX 1196 Y 1
PFX 1196 0 naj .
SFX 1197 Y 1
SFX 1197 oky sieho .
PFX 1197 Y 1
PFX 1197 0 naj .
SFX 1198 Y 1
SFX 1198 oky siemu .
PFX 1198 Y 1
PFX 1198 0 naj .
SFX 1199 Y 1
SFX 1199 oky som .
PFX 1199 Y 1
PFX 1199 0 naj .
SFX 1200 Y 1
SFX 1200 oky sim .
PFX 1200 Y 1
PFX 1200 0 naj .
SFX 1201 Y 1
SFX 1201 oky sich .
PFX 1201 Y 1
PFX 1201 0 naj .
SFX 1202 Y 1
SFX 1202 oky simi .
PFX 1202 Y 1
PFX 1202 0 naj .
SFX 1203 Y 1
SFX 1203 oky sie .
PFX 1203 Y 1
PFX 1203 0 naj .
SFX 1204 Y 1
SFX 1204 oky sia .
PFX 1204 Y 1
PFX 1204 0 naj .
SFX 1205 Y 1
SFX 1205 oky sej .
PFX 1205 Y 1
PFX 1205 0 naj .
SFX 1206 Y 1
SFX 1206 oky siu .
PFX 1206 Y 1
PFX 1206 0 naj .
SFX 1207 Y 1
SFX 1207 oky sou .
PFX 1207 Y 1
PFX 1207 0 naj .
SFX 1208 Y 1
SFX 1208 at ieme .
PFX 1208 Y 1
PFX 1208 h poze .
SFX 1209 Y 1
SFX 1209 at iete .
PFX 1209 Y 1
PFX 1209 h poze .
SFX 1210 Y 1
SFX 1210 at u .
PFX 1210 Y 1
PFX 1210 h poze .
SFX 1211 Y 1
SFX 1211 at iem .
PFX 1211 Y 1
PFX 1211 h poze .
SFX 1212 Y 1
SFX 1212 at ies .
PFX 1212 Y 1
PFX 1212 h poze .
SFX 1213 Y 1
SFX 1213 at ie .
PFX 1213 Y 1
PFX 1213 h poze .
SFX 1214 Y 1
SFX 1214 at iem .
PFX 1214 Y 1
PFX 1214 h ze .
SFX 1215 Y 1
SFX 1215 at ies .
PFX 1215 Y 1
PFX 1215 h ze .
SFX 1216 Y 1
SFX 1216 at ie .
PFX 1216 Y 1
PFX 1216 h ze .
SFX 1217 Y 1
SFX 1217 at ieme .
PFX 1217 Y 1
PFX 1217 h ze .
SFX 1218 Y 1
SFX 1218 at iete .
PFX 1218 Y 1
PFX 1218 h ze .
SFX 1219 Y 1
SFX 1219 at u .
PFX 1219 Y 1
PFX 1219 h ze .
SFX 1220 Y 1
SFX 1220 at 0 .
PFX 1220 Y 1
PFX 1220 h ze .
SFX 1221 Y 1
SFX 1221 at me .
PFX 1221 Y 1
PFX 1221 h ze .
SFX 1222 Y 1
SFX 1222 at te .
PFX 1222 Y 1
PFX 1222 h ze .
SFX 1223 Y 1
SFX 1223 at uc .
PFX 1223 Y 1
PFX 1223 h ze .
SFX 1224 Y 1
SFX 1224 t 0 .
PFX 1224 Y 1
PFX 1224 hn hnet .
SFX 1225 N 1
SFX 1225 ado iad .
SFX 1226 N 1
SFX 1226 le iel .
SFX 1227 N 1
SFX 1227 iebst ebiem .
SFX 1228 N 1
SFX 1228 iebst ebies .
SFX 1229 N 1
SFX 1229 iebst ebie .
SFX 1230 N 1
SFX 1230 iebst ebieme .
SFX 1231 N 1
SFX 1231 iebst ebiete .
SFX 1232 N 1
SFX 1232 iebst ebu .
SFX 1233 N 1
SFX 1233 iebst eb .
SFX 1234 N 1
SFX 1234 iebst ebme .
SFX 1235 N 1
SFX 1235 iebst ebte .
SFX 1236 N 1
SFX 1236 iebst ebuc .
SFX 1237 N 1
SFX 1237 st ol .
SFX 1238 N 1
SFX 1238 st la .
SFX 1239 N 1
SFX 1239 st lo .
SFX 1240 N 1
SFX 1240 st li .
SFX 1241 N 1
SFX 1241 iec ce .
SFX 1242 N 1
SFX 1242 iec cov .
SFX 1243 N 1
SFX 1243 iec coch .
SFX 1244 N 1
SFX 1244 iec cami .
SFX 1245 Y 1
SFX 1245 ut ieme .
PFX 1245 Y 1
PFX 1245 0 po .
SFX 1246 Y 1
SFX 1246 ut iete .
PFX 1246 Y 1
PFX 1246 0 po .
SFX 1247 Y 1
SFX 1247 t 0 .
PFX 1247 Y 1
PFX 1247 0 po .
SFX 1248 Y 1
SFX 1248 ut iem .
PFX 1248 Y 1
PFX 1248 0 po .
SFX 1249 Y 1
SFX 1249 ut ies .
PFX 1249 Y 1
PFX 1249 0 po .
SFX 1250 Y 1
SFX 1250 ut ie .
PFX 1250 Y 1
PFX 1250 0 po .
SFX 1251 N 1
SFX 1251 s a .
SFX 1252 N 1
SFX 1252 s ovi .
SFX 1253 N 1
SFX 1253 s om .
SFX 1254 N 1
SFX 1254 s ovia .
SFX 1255 N 1
SFX 1255 s ov .
SFX 1256 N 1
SFX 1256 s och .
SFX 1257 N 1
SFX 1257 st diem .
SFX 1258 N 1
SFX 1258 st dies .
SFX 1259 N 1
SFX 1259 st die .
SFX 1260 N 1
SFX 1260 st dieme .
SFX 1261 N 1
SFX 1261 st diete .
SFX 1262 N 1
SFX 1262 st d .
SFX 1263 N 1
SFX 1263 st dme .
SFX 1264 N 1
SFX 1264 st dte .
SFX 1265 N 1
SFX 1265 va ev .
SFX 1266 N 1
SFX 1266 la al .
SFX 1267 N 1
SFX 1267 um ier .
PFX 1268 N 1
PFX 1268 j mn .
PFX 1269 N 1
PFX 1269 j m .
SFX 1270 N 1
SFX 1270 ja mne .
SFX 1271 N 1
SFX 1271 ja mi .
SFX 1272 N 1
SFX 1272 ja mnou .
SFX 1273 N 1
SFX 1273 ada iad .
SFX 1274 N 1
SFX 1274 en nych .
SFX 1275 N 1
SFX 1275 en nym .
SFX 1276 N 1
SFX 1276 en nymi .
SFX 1277 N 1
SFX 1277 en nej .
SFX 1278 N 1
SFX 1278 en neho .
SFX 1279 N 1
SFX 1279 en nemu .
SFX 1280 N 1
SFX 1280 en no .
SFX 1281 N 1
SFX 1281 lo al .
SFX 1282 N 1
SFX 1282 ro ar .
SFX 1283 N 1
SFX 1283 ety iet .
SFX 1284 Y 1
SFX 1284 a 0 .
PFX 1284 Y 1
PFX 1284 k ki .
SFX 1285 N 1
SFX 1285 or rovia .
SFX 1286 N 1
SFX 1286 eso ies .
SFX 1287 N 1
SFX 1287 os e .
PFX 1288 N 1
PFX 1288 kt koh .
PFX 1289 N 1
PFX 1289 kto komu .
PFX 1290 N 1
PFX 1290 kto kom .
PFX 1291 N 1
PFX 1291 kto kym .
PFX 1292 N 1
PFX 1292 ktory ktore .
PFX 1293 N 1
PFX 1293 ktory ktorych .
PFX 1294 N 1
PFX 1294 ktory ktorym .
PFX 1295 N 1
PFX 1295 ktory ktorymi .
PFX 1296 N 1
PFX 1296 ktory ktora .
PFX 1297 N 1
PFX 1297 ktory ktorej .
PFX 1298 N 1
PFX 1298 ktory ktoru .
PFX 1299 N 1
PFX 1299 ktory ktorou .
PFX 1300 N 1
PFX 1300 ktory ktoreho .
PFX 1301 N 1
PFX 1301 ktory ktoremu .
PFX 1302 N 1
PFX 1302 ktory ktorom .
PFX 1303 N 1
PFX 1303 ktory ktori .
SFX 1304 Y 1
SFX 1304 ut eme .
PFX 1304 Y 1
PFX 1304 0 po .
SFX 1305 Y 1
SFX 1305 ut ete .
PFX 1305 Y 1
PFX 1305 0 po .
SFX 1306 Y 1
SFX 1306 ut em .
PFX 1306 Y 1
PFX 1306 0 po .
SFX 1307 Y 1
SFX 1307 ut es .
PFX 1307 Y 1
PFX 1307 0 po .
SFX 1308 Y 1
SFX 1308 ut e .
PFX 1308 Y 1
PFX 1308 0 po .
SFX 1309 N 1
SFX 1309 y ieho .
SFX 1310 N 1
SFX 1310 y iemu .
SFX 1311 N 1
SFX 1311 y ie .
SFX 1312 N 1
SFX 1312 et ta .
SFX 1313 N 1
SFX 1313 et ti .
SFX 1314 N 1
SFX 1314 ze hoze .
PFX 1315 N 1
PFX 1315 ky kieho .
SFX 1316 N 1
SFX 1316 ze muze .
PFX 1317 N 1
PFX 1317 ky kiemu .
PFX 1318 N 1
PFX 1318 ky kom .
PFX 1319 N 1
PFX 1319 ky ki .
PFX 1320 N 1
PFX 1320 ky ke .
PFX 1321 N 1
PFX 1321 ky kie .
PFX 1322 N 1
PFX 1322 ky ka .
PFX 1323 N 1
PFX 1323 ky kej .
PFX 1324 N 1
PFX 1324 ky ku .
PFX 1325 N 1
PFX 1325 ky kou .
PFX 1326 N 1
PFX 1326 ky keho .
PFX 1327 N 1
PFX 1327 ky kemu .
SFX 1328 Y 1
SFX 1328 a 0 .
PFX 1328 Y 1
PFX 1328 kl kli .
SFX 1329 N 1
SFX 1329 no en .
SFX 1330 N 1
SFX 1330 enda iend .
SFX 1331 N 1
SFX 1331 no iel .
SFX 1332 Y 1
SFX 1332 a 0 .
PFX 1332 Y 1
PFX 1332 l li .
SFX 1333 Y 1
SFX 1333 0 i .
PFX 1333 Y 1
PFX 1333 le l .
SFX 1334 Y 1
SFX 1334 0 ou .
PFX 1334 Y 1
PFX 1334 le l .
SFX 1335 Y 1
SFX 1335 0 iam .
PFX 1335 Y 1
PFX 1335 le l .
SFX 1336 Y 1
SFX 1336 0 iach .
PFX 1336 Y 1
PFX 1336 le l .
SFX 1337 Y 1
SFX 1337 0 ami .
PFX 1337 Y 1
PFX 1337 le l .
SFX 1338 Y 1
SFX 1338 et me .
PFX 1338 Y 1
PFX 1338 0 po .
SFX 1339 Y 1
SFX 1339 et te .
PFX 1339 Y 1
PFX 1339 0 po .
SFX 1340 Y 1
SFX 1340 et a .
PFX 1340 Y 1
PFX 1340 0 po .
SFX 1341 Y 1
SFX 1341 et m .
PFX 1341 Y 1
PFX 1341 0 po .
SFX 1342 Y 1
SFX 1342 et s .
PFX 1342 Y 1
PFX 1342 0 po .
SFX 1343 Y 1
SFX 1343 et 0 .
PFX 1343 Y 1
PFX 1343 0 po .
SFX 1344 Y 1
SFX 1344 o 0 .
PFX 1344 Y 1
PFX 1344 l li .
SFX 1345 N 1
SFX 1345 ik kovi .
SFX 1346 Y 1
SFX 1346 zt ieme .
PFX 1346 Y 1
PFX 1346 l pol .
SFX 1347 Y 1
SFX 1347 zt iete .
PFX 1347 Y 1
PFX 1347 l pol .
SFX 1348 Y 1
SFX 1348 t u .
PFX 1348 Y 1
PFX 1348 li pol .
SFX 1349 Y 1
SFX 1349 zt iem .
PFX 1349 Y 1
PFX 1349 l pol .
SFX 1350 Y 1
SFX 1350 zt ies .
PFX 1350 Y 1
PFX 1350 l pol .
SFX 1351 Y 1
SFX 1351 zt ie .
PFX 1351 Y 1
PFX 1351 l pol .
SFX 1352 Y 1
SFX 1352 zt iem .
PFX 1352 Y 1
PFX 1352 l l .
SFX 1353 Y 1
SFX 1353 zt ies .
PFX 1353 Y 1
PFX 1353 l l .
SFX 1354 Y 1
SFX 1354 zt ie .
PFX 1354 Y 1
PFX 1354 l l .
SFX 1355 Y 1
SFX 1355 zt ieme .
PFX 1355 Y 1
PFX 1355 l l .
SFX 1356 Y 1
SFX 1356 zt iete .
PFX 1356 Y 1
PFX 1356 l l .
SFX 1357 Y 1
SFX 1357 t u .
PFX 1357 Y 1
PFX 1357 li l .
SFX 1358 Y 1
SFX 1358 t 0 .
PFX 1358 Y 1
PFX 1358 li l .
SFX 1359 Y 1
SFX 1359 t me .
PFX 1359 Y 1
PFX 1359 li l .
SFX 1360 Y 1
SFX 1360 0 e .
PFX 1360 Y 1
PFX 1360 li l .
SFX 1361 Y 1
SFX 1361 t uc .
PFX 1361 Y 1
PFX 1361 li l .
SFX 1362 N 1
SFX 1362 en novi .
SFX 1363 N 1
SFX 1363 oz zi .
SFX 1364 N 1
SFX 1364 oz zou .
SFX 1365 N 1
SFX 1365 oz ziam .
SFX 1366 N 1
SFX 1366 oz ziach .
SFX 1367 N 1
SFX 1367 oz zami .
SFX 1368 N 1
SFX 1368 hat zem .
SFX 1369 N 1
SFX 1369 hat zes .
SFX 1370 N 1
SFX 1370 hat ze .
SFX 1371 N 1
SFX 1371 hat zeme .
SFX 1372 N 1
SFX 1372 hat zete .
SFX 1373 N 1
SFX 1373 hat zu .
SFX 1374 N 1
SFX 1374 hat z .
SFX 1375 N 1
SFX 1375 hat zme .
SFX 1376 N 1
SFX 1376 hat zte .
SFX 1377 N 1
SFX 1377 hat zuc .
SFX 1378 N 1
SFX 1378 esto iest .
SFX 1379 N 1
SFX 1379 aly ensi .
SFX 1380 N 1
SFX 1380 aly ensieho .
SFX 1381 N 1
SFX 1381 aly ensiemu .
SFX 1382 N 1
SFX 1382 aly ensom .
SFX 1383 N 1
SFX 1383 aly ensim .
SFX 1384 N 1
SFX 1384 aly ensich .
SFX 1385 N 1
SFX 1385 aly ensimi .
SFX 1386 N 1
SFX 1386 aly ensie .
SFX 1387 N 1
SFX 1387 aly ensia .
SFX 1388 N 1
SFX 1388 aly ensej .
SFX 1389 N 1
SFX 1389 aly ensiu .
SFX 1390 N 1
SFX 1390 aly ensou .
SFX 1391 Y 1
SFX 1391 aly jmensi .
PFX 1391 Y 1
PFX 1391 0 n .
SFX 1392 Y 1
SFX 1392 aly jmensieho .
PFX 1392 Y 1
PFX 1392 0 n .
SFX 1393 Y 1
SFX 1393 aly jmensiemu .
PFX 1393 Y 1
PFX 1393 0 n .
SFX 1394 Y 1
SFX 1394 aly jmensom .
PFX 1394 Y 1
PFX 1394 0 n .
SFX 1395 Y 1
SFX 1395 aly jmensim .
PFX 1395 Y 1
PFX 1395 0 n .
SFX 1396 Y 1
SFX 1396 aly jmensich .
PFX 1396 Y 1
PFX 1396 0 n .
SFX 1397 Y 1
SFX 1397 aly jmensimi .
PFX 1397 Y 1
PFX 1397 0 n .
SFX 1398 Y 1
SFX 1398 aly jmensie .
PFX 1398 Y 1
PFX 1398 0 n .
SFX 1399 Y 1
SFX 1399 aly jmensia .
PFX 1399 Y 1
PFX 1399 0 n .
SFX 1400 Y 1
SFX 1400 aly jmensej .
PFX 1400 Y 1
PFX 1400 0 n .
SFX 1401 Y 1
SFX 1401 aly jmensiu .
PFX 1401 Y 1
PFX 1401 0 n .
SFX 1402 Y 1
SFX 1402 aly jmensou .
